Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.112

Ethnic studies materials and resources.

(1) By September 1, 2021, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall identify and make available ethnic studies materials and resources for use in grades kindergarten through twelve. The materials and resources must be designed to prepare students to be global citizens in a global society with an appreciation for the contributions of multiple cultures. The materials and resources must be posted on the office of the superintendent of public instruction's website.

(2)(a) Public schools with students in grades seven through twelve are encouraged to offer an ethnic studies course that incorporates the materials and resources identified under subsection (1) of this section.

(b) Public schools with students in grades kindergarten through six are encouraged to incorporate the materials and resources identified under subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2020 c 59 s 2; 2019 c 279 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2019 c 279: "The legislature intends that nothing in this act supersedes the use of the Since Time Immemorial: Tribal sovereignty in Washington state curriculum, developed as required under RCW 28A.320.170(1)(b)." [ 2019 c 279 s 5.]

Intent—2019 c 279: See note following RCW 28A.655.300.